Hawaii, session 2026, HB1862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 452, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§452-     Exemption from licensure.  (a)  A person shall be exempt from licensure under this chapter if the person: (1)  Engages in the manipulation of the soft tissues of only the hands, feet, or outer ears, including the practice of reflexology and foot zone therapy; (2)  Performs the services described under paragraph (1) for clients who remain fully clothed; (3)  Is certified by, and in good standing with, an industry-recognized organization that represents practitioners who perform the services described under paragraph (1) with established standards and ethics; and (4)  Does not otherwise provide massage therapy for clients, whether or not for compensation. (b)  Establishments that offer only the services as described in subsection (a) shall be exempt from licensure as provided in section 452-3. (c)  Any person exempt from licensure as provided by this section shall be exempt from the advertising regulations established pursuant to section 452-23." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________